Georgia statutes. TITLE 23 Equity
PART 2 Quia Timet Against All the World

23-3-60.
Purpose of part.

The purpose of this part is to create a procedure for removing any cloud upon the title to land, including the equity of redemption by owners of land sold at tax sales, and for readily and conclusively establishing that certain named persons are the owners of all the interests in land defined by a decree entered in such proceeding, so that there shall be no occasion for land in this state to be unmarketable because of any uncertainty as to the owner of every interest therein.

History.

Ga. L. 1966, p. 443, § 11.

Law reviews.

For annual survey of law on real property, see 62 Mercer L. Rev. 283 (2010).

For annual survey on real property, see 65 Mercer L. Rev. 233 (2013).

For annual survey on local government law, see 68 Mercer L. Rev. 199 (2016).

For annual survey on real property, see 71 Mercer L. Rev. 241 (2019).

23-3-61.
Who may bring proceeding.

Any person, which term shall include a corporation, partnership, or other association, who claims an estate of freehold present or future or any estate for years of which at least five years are unexpired, including persons holding lands under tax deeds, in any land in this state, whether in the actual and peaceable possession thereof or not and whether the land is vacant or not, may bring a proceeding in rem against all the world to establish his title to the land and to determine all adverse claims thereto or to remove any particular cloud or clouds upon his title to the land, including an equity of redemption, which proceeding may be against all persons known or unknown who claim or might claim adversely to him, whether or not the petition discloses any known or possible claimants.

History.

Ga. L. 1966, p. 443, § 1.

Law reviews.

For article, “Tracing Georgia’s English Common Law Equity Jurisprudential Roots: Quia Timet,” see 14 The Journal of Southern Legal History 135 (2006).

23-3-62.
Venue; contents, verification and filing of petition; filing in lis pendens docket.

The proceeding in rem shall be instituted by filing a petition in the superior court of the county in which the land is situated.

The petition shall be verified by the petitioner and shall contain a particular description of the land to be involved in the proceeding, a specification of the petitioner’s interest in the land, a statement as to whether the interest is based upon a written instrument (whether same be a contract, deed, will, or otherwise) or adverse possession or both, a description of all adverse claims of which petitioner has actual or constructive notice, the names and addresses, so far as known to the petitioner, of any possible adverse claimant, and, if the proceeding is brought to remove a particular cloud or clouds, a statement as to the grounds upon which it is sought to remove the cloud or clouds.

With the petition there shall be filed (1) a plat of survey of the land, (2) a copy of the immediate instrument or instruments, if any, upon which the petitioner’s interest is based, and (3) a copy of the immediate instrument or instruments of record or otherwise known to the petitioner, if any, upon which any person might base an interest in the land adverse to the petitioner.

Upon the filing of the petition, the petitioner shall contemporaneously file with the clerk of the court a notice for record in the lis pendens docket pursuant to Code Sections 44-14-610 through 44-14-613.

History.

Ga. L. 1966, p. 443, § 2.

Law reviews.

For note discussing problems with venue in Georgia, and proposing statutory revisions to improve the resolution of venue questions, see 9 Ga. St. B.J. 254 (1972).

23-3-63.
Submission to special master.

The court, upon receipt of the petition together with the plat and instruments filed therewith, shall submit the same to a special master who shall be a person who is authorized to practice law in this state and is a resident of the judicial circuit wherein the action is brought.

History.

Ga. L. 1966, p. 443, § 3.

Law reviews.

For annual survey of law on real property, see 62 Mercer L. Rev. 283 (2010).

23-3-64.
Other required evidence.

The master shall examine the petition, plat, and all documents filed therewith and may require other evidence to be filed, including, but not limited to, an abstract of title.

History.

Ga. L. 1966, p. 443, § 4.

23-3-65.
Notice; process; service by publication; filing of adverse pleading; appointment of disinterested representative.

Upon the filing of all evidence with him, the master shall:

Determine who is entitled to notice, including, but not limited to, all adjacent landowners and all adverse claimants as to whose adverse claims petitioner has actual or constructive notice;

Cause process to issue, directed to all persons who are entitled to notice and to all other persons whom it may concern.

Process shall be served upon known persons whose residence is ascertainable by the sheriff or his deputy as provided by law. In all cases where service by publication is permitted under the laws and where the respondent or other party resides outside this state or whose residence is unknown and it is necessary to perfect service upon such person by publication, upon the fact being made to appear to the judge or clerk of the court in which the action is pending, the judge or clerk may order service to be perfected by publication in the paper in which sheriffs’ advertisements are printed, four times within the ensuing 30 days, publications to be weekly. The published notice shall contain the name of the petitioner and respondent with a caption setting forth the court, the character of the action, the date the action was filed, the date of the order for service by publication, and a notice directed and addressed to the party to be thus served, commanding him to be and appear at the court in which the action is pending within 30 days of the date of the order for service by publication, and shall bear teste in the name of the judge and shall be signed by the clerk of the court. The date upon which the nonresident or party whose residence is unknown is called upon to appear shall be the appearance day of the case.

Any adverse party shall be entitled to have at least 30 days after completion of service to file any pleading he desires in the matter before the court.

If, upon the filing of the petition or of the evidence required by him, the master finds that there are persons under a disability, or minors, or persons not in being, unascertained, or unknown who may have an interest, he shall appoint a disinterested person, in the nature of a guardian ad litem, who shall be served with copies of the notice prescribed and who shall represent these interests.

History.

Ga. L. 1966, p. 443, § 5.

23-3-66.
Jurisdiction of special master; trial by jury.

Upon reasonable notice to the parties, after proof of serving notice as required by this article has been filed and after the appointment of the disinterested person as representative where required, the special master shall have complete jurisdiction within the scope of the pleadings to ascertain and determine the validity, nature, or extent of petitioner’s title and all other interests in the land, or any part thereof, which may be adverse to the title claimed by the petitioner, or to remove any particular cloud or clouds upon the title to the land and to make a report of his findings to the judge of the court; provided, however, any party to this proceeding may demand a trial by a jury of any question of fact; provided, further, that the master on his own initiative may require a trial by a jury of any question of fact.

History.

Ga. L. 1966, p. 443, § 6.

Law reviews.

For article surveying development of equity and the right to trial by jury in equity actions in Georgia, and advocating use of jury to try issues of fact in equitable actions, see 8 Mercer L. Rev. 225 (1957).

For survey article on real property law, see 60 Mercer L. Rev. 345 (2008).

For annual survey of law on real property, see 62 Mercer L. Rev. 283 (2010).

For annual survey on real property, see 65 Mercer L. Rev. 233 (2013).

23-3-67.
Decree; effect of recordation.

Upon the receipt of the master’s report or upon a jury verdict, the court shall issue a decree which shall be recorded in the office of the clerk of the superior court of the county or counties wherein the land affected lies and which, when recorded, shall operate to bind the land affected according to the tenor thereof and shall be conclusive upon and against all persons named therein, known or unknown. A marginal reference to the recorded judgments and decree shall be entered upon any recorded instrument stated to be affected thereby.

History.

Ga. L. 1966, p. 443, § 7.

23-3-68.
Compensation of master and representative; taxing as part of costs.

The court shall fix a reasonable compensation, not less than $50.00, to be paid to the master appointed under this part and shall fix the compensation to be paid to any representative in the nature of a guardian ad litem appointed under this part. These fees are to be taxed in the discretion of the court as a part of the costs.

History.

Ga. L. 1966, p. 443, § 8.

23-3-69.
Intervention after entering of decree.

At any time within 30 days from the entering of the final decree, any person not previously a party who claims an interest in the land may intervene, in which event the case shall be reopened as to that party so that his rights may be adjudicated.

History.

Ga. L. 1966, p. 443, § 9.

23-3-70.
Joinder.

Two or more persons having separate and distinct parcels of land in the same county and holding under the same source of title or persons having separate and distinct interests in the same parcel or parcels may join in a petition under this part against the same supposed claimants.

A petitioner may join separate causes of action in one petition; but, if they cannot be conveniently disposed of together, the court may order separate trials.

History.

Ga. L. 1966, p. 443, § 10.

23-3-71.
Liberal construction.

This part shall be liberally construed.

History.

Ga. L. 1966, p. 443, § 12.

23-3-72.
Remedy cumulative.

The remedy provided by this part is intended to be cumulative and not exclusive.

History.

Ga. L. 1966, p. 443, § 13.

23-3-73.
Enforcement of article.

All municipalities, counties, and housing authorities shall have standing pursuant to this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

23-3-73

, enacted by Ga. L. 2006, p. 39, § 18/HB 1313.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2006, p. 39, § 1/HB 1313, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as ‘The Landowner’s Bill of Rights and Private Property Protection Act.’ ”

Ga. L. 2006, p. 39, § 25/HB 1313, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment to this Code section shall only apply to petitions for condemnation filed on or after April 4, 2006.

Law reviews.

For article on 2006 enactment of this Code section, see 23 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 157 (2006).